tools/src/parsers/test/replace_test_35.xfst
set print-weight ON

regex b -> a::1  || _a ;
apply up bbba
echo --

regex b -> a::1  \\ _a ;
apply up bbba
echo --

regex b -> a::1  // _a ;
apply up bbba
echo --

regex b -> a::1  \/ _a ;
apply up bbba
